Illinois, session 104th, HB1110.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Gun-Free Zone Liability Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. 7    (a) The General Assembly finds as follows:8        (1) the Second Amendment to the United States 9    Constitution guarantees the right of individuals to keep 10    and bear arms for self-defense;11        (2) the State of Illinois permits individuals to carry 12    firearms under the Firearm Concealed Carry Act;13        (3) certain areas are designated as gun-free zones 14    under Illinois law, where the possession of firearms is 15    prohibited regardless of a person's concealed carry 16    license status; and17        (4) individuals who are prohibited from carrying 18    firearms in gun-free zones may be unable to defend 19    themselves effectively, which could result in harm or 20    damage that may have been avoidable if they were allowed 21    to carry a firearm.22    (b) It is in the public interest to hold the State of 23Illinois accountable for harm or damages suffered in such   HB1110- 2 -LRB104 06401 RLC 16437 b1circumstances to ensure fairness and personal safety. 2    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:3    "Concealed carry licensee" means a person who holds a 4valid concealed carry license under the Firearm Concealed 5Carry Act.6    "Gun-free zone" means any location or premises where the 7possession of firearms is prohibited by State law, including, 8but not limited to, areas identified under section 65 of the 9Firearm Concealed Carry Act.10    "Harm" means any physical injury, emotional distress, loss 11of life, or property damage incurred as a direct result of an 12incident in a gun-free zone that could have been reasonably 13avoided if the individual were permitted to carry a firearm. 14    Section 15. Liability for avoidable harm in gun-free 15zones. The State of Illinois is liable for harm or damage 16suffered by a concealed carry licensee or any individual 17otherwise legally entitled to carry a firearm if the harm or 18damage occurs in a gun-free zone, as defined by State law, and 19the harm or damage could have been reasonably avoided if the 20individual had been allowed to carry his or her concealed 21firearm in that gun-free zone. Liability includes, but is not 22limited to, medical expenses, compensation for pain and 23suffering, loss of income, property damage, and wrongful death 24claims brought by the victim's estate.   HB1110- 3 -LRB104 06401 RLC 16437 b1    Section 20. Burden of proof. The plaintiff must establish 2by a preponderance of the evidence that the harm or damage 3suffered could have been reasonably avoided or mitigated if 4the plaintiff had been permitted to carry a concealed firearm, 5and that the plaintiff is otherwise in compliance with all 6applicable laws and regulations regarding firearm possession 7and use. 8    Section 25. Exceptions. The State of Illinois is not 9liable:10    (1) if the harm or damage occurred as a result of the 11individual's unlawful conduct;12    (2) the individual failed to comply with other applicable 13State or federal firearm laws;14    (3) the harm was caused by an act of God or a third party 15not under the control of the State; or16    (4) the individual was not lawfully entitled to carry a 17firearm at the time of the incident. 18    Section 30. Damages and remedies. Any individual described 19in Section 15 who is harmed may bring a civil action against 20the State of Illinois in the circuit court of the county of the 21plaintiff's residence. If the plaintiff prevails, he or she is 22entitled to full compensatory damages, court costs, and 23reasonable attorney's fees, and any other relief the court   HB1110- 4 -LRB104 06401 RLC 16437 b1deems just and equitable. 2    Section 35. Severability. If any provision of this Act or 3its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not 4affect other provisions or applications of this Act that can 5be given effect without the invalid provision or application, 6and to this end, the provisions of this Act are severable. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.